North Dakota, session 69, SB2037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-04.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-04.1-01. Standard for lack of criminal responsibility.
1. An individual is not criminally responsible for criminal conduct if, as a result of mental disease
or defect existing at the time the conduct occurs:
a. The individual lacks substantial capacity to comprehend the harmful nature or
consequences of the conduct, or the conduct is the result of a loss or serious distortion of
the individual's capacity to recognize reality; and
b. It is an essential element of the crime charged that the individual act willfully.
2. For purposes of this chapter, repeated criminal or similar antisocial conduct, or impairment of
mental condition caused primarily by voluntary use of alcoholic beverages or controlled
substances immediately before or contemporaneously with the alleged offense, does not
constitute in itself mental illness or defect at the time of the alleged offense. Evidence of the
conduct or impairment may be probative in conjunction with other evidence to establish mental
illness or defect.
3. An individual ten years of age or older may be assessed for criminal responsibility under this
chapter.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-04.1-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-04.1-20. Jurisdiction of court.
1. Unless earlier discharged by order of the court pursuant to section 12.1-04.1-22, 12.1-04.1-24,
or 12.1-04.1-25, an individual found not guilty by reason of lack of criminal responsibility is
subject to the jurisdiction of the court for a period equal to the maximum term of imprisonment
that could have been imposed for the most serious crime of which the individual was charged

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 2
but found not guilty by reason of lack of criminal responsibility. In a juvenile proceeding, a child
not adjudicated by reason of lack of criminal responsibility is subject to the jurisdiction of the
court for one year.
2. Upon expiration of its jurisdiction under this chapter or earlier discharge by its order, the court
may order that a proceeding for involuntary commitment be initiated pursuant to chapter
25-03.1. In a juvenile proceeding, the court may order an investigation into whether a child in
need of protection proceedings should be initiated under chapter 27 - 20.3 .
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-17-01.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-17-01.2. Domestic violence.
1. For purposes of this section "family or household member" means family or household
member as defined in section 14-07.1-01.
2. A person is guilty of an offense if that person willfully causes:
a. Bodily injury to the actor's family or household member;
b. Substantial bodily injury to the actor's family or household member; or
c. Serious bodily injury to the actor's family or household member.
3. The offense is:
a. A class B misdemeanor for the first offense under subdivision a of subsection 2 and a
class A misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense under this section or sections
12.1-17-01, 12.1-17-01.1, or 12.1-17-02 involving the commission of domestic violence,
as defined in section 14-07.1-01. For purposes of this subdivision, a prior conviction
includes a conviction of any assault offense in which a finding of domestic violence was
made under a law or ordinance of another state which is equivalent to this section.
b. A class A misdemeanor for an offense under subdivision b of subsection 2 and a class C
felony for an offense under subdivision c of subsection 2.
c. A class B felony for an offense under subdivision b or c of subsection 2 if the victim is
under twelve years of age.
4. A person charged with an offense under this section must be prosecuted in district court.
5. This section applies to an individual under the age of eighteen if the:
a. Victim is or was in a dating relationship with the individual; or
b. Individual has a child in common with the victim.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 12.1-17-07.2 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. A person commits the offense of distribution of intimate images if the person knowingly or
intentionally distributes to any third party any intimate image of an individual eighteen years of
age or older, if:
a. The person knows that the depicted individual has not given consent to the person to
distribute the intimate image;
b. The intimate image was created by or provided to the person under circumstances in
which the individual has a reasonable expectation of privacy; and

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 3
c. Actual emotional distress or harm is caused to the individual as a result of the distribution
under this section.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-20-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-20-01. General provisions.
In sections 12.1-20-03 through 12.1-20-08:
1. When the criminality of conduct depends on a child'schild being below the age of fifteen, it is
no defense that the actor did not know the child's age, or reasonably believed the child to be
older than fourteen.
2. When criminality depends on the victim being a minor, it is an affirmative defense that the
actor reasonably believed the victim to be an adult.
3. When criminality depends on the victim being a minor fifteen years of age or older, the actor is
guilty of an offense only if the actor is at least three years older than the minor.
4. When criminality depends on the victim being below the age of fifteen, and the actor is a
minor, the actor is guilty of an offense only if the actor is at least three years older than the
victim.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. It is a noncriminal offense for an individual under twenty-oneeighteen years of age or older but
under twenty-one years of age, and an infraction for an individual fourteen years of age or
older but under eighteen years of age, to purchase, possess, smoke, or use cigarettes, cigars,
cigarette papers, snuff, tobacco in any other form in which it may be utilized for smoking or
chewing, electronic smoking devices, or alternative nicotine products. However, an individual
under twenty-one years of age may purchase and possess tobacco, electronic smoking
devices, or alternative nicotine products as part of a compliance survey program when acting
with the permission of the individual's parent or guardian and while acting under the
supervision of any law enforcement authority. A state agency, city, county, board of health,
tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or alternative nicotine products retailer, or association of
tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or alternative nicotine products retailers may also
conduct compliance surveys, after coordination with the appropriate local law enforcement
authority.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 12.1-31-03 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. An individual fourteen years of age or older but under eighteen years of age found to have
violated subsection 2 or 4 must pay a fee of twenty-five dollarshas committed an infraction and
must be sent to juvenile court. An individual eighteen years of age or older but under twenty-
one years of age found to have violated subsection 2 or 4 must pay a fee of twenty - five
dollars.
a. Any individual who has been cited for a violation of subsection 2 or 4 may appear before
a court of competent jurisdiction and pay the fee by the time scheduled for a hearing, or if
bond has been posted, may forfeit the bond by not appearing at the scheduled time. An
individual appearing at the time scheduled in the citation may make a statement in
explanation of that individual's action and the judge may waive, reduce, or suspend the
fee or bond, or both. If the individual cited follows the procedures of this subdivision, that
individual has admitted the violation and has waived the right to a hearing on the issue of
commission of the violation. The bond required to secure appearance before the court

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 4
must be identical to the fee. This subdivision does not allow a citing officer to receive the
fee or bond.
b. If an individual cited for a violation of subsection 2 or 4 does not choose to follow the
procedures provided under subdivision a, that individual may request a hearing on the
issue of the commission of the violation cited. The hearing must be held at the time
scheduled in the citation or at some future time, not to exceed ninety days later, set at
that first appearance. At the time of a request for a hearing on the issue on commission
of the violation, the individual cited shall deposit with the court an appearance bond equal
to the fee for the violation cited.
c. The failure to post bond or to pay an assessed fee is punishable as a contempt of court,
except an individual may not be imprisoned for the contempt.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-32-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-32-15. Offenders against children and sexual offenders - Sexually violent predators -
Registration requirement - Penalty.
1. As used in this section:
a. "A crime against a child" means a violation of chapter 12.1-16, section 12.1-17-01.1 if the
victim is under the age of twelve, 12.1-17-02, 12.1-17-04, subdivision a of subsection 6 of
section 12.1-17-07.1, section 12.1-18-01, 12.1-18-02, 12.1-18-05, chapter 12.1-29, or
section 14-09-22, subsection 3 of section 12.1-41-02, subsection 3 of section 12.1-41-03,
or an equivalent offense from another court in the United States, a tribal court, or court of
another country, in which the victim is a minor or is otherwise of the age required for the
act to be a crime or an attempt or conspiracy to commit these offenses.
b. "Department" means the department of corrections and rehabilitation.
c. "Homeless" means an individual who is physically present in this state, but is living in a
park, under a bridge, on the streets, in a vehicle or camper, or is otherwise without a
traditional dwelling, and also one who resides in this state but does not maintain a
permanent address. The term does not include individuals who are temporarily domiciled
or individuals residing in public or private shelters that provide temporary living
accommodations.
d. "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition of an individual that
affects the emotional or volitional capacity of the individual in a manner that predisposes
that individual to the commission of criminal sexual acts to a degree that makes the
individual a menace to the health and safety of other individuals.
e. "Predatory" means an act directed at a stranger or at an individual with whom a
relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization.
f. "Reside" means to live permanently or be situated for a considerable time in a home or a
particular place.
g. "Sexual offender" means a person who has pled guilty to or been found guilty, including
juvenile delinquent adjudications, of a violation of section 12.1-20-03, 12.1-20-03.1,
12.1-20-04, 12.1-20-05, 12.1-20-05.1, 12.1-20-06, 12.1-20-06.1, 12.1-20-07 except for
subdivision a of subsection 1, 12.1-20-11, 12.1-20-12.1, 12.1-20-12.2, 12.1-20-12.3
except for subdivision a of subsection 1 and subdivision b of subsection 1 if the offense
involves only a demand for money, chapter 12.1-27.2, subsection 2 of section
12.1-22-03.1, subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 12.1-41-02, section 12.1-41-04,
12.1-41-05, or 12.1-41-06, or an equivalent offense from another court in the United

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 5
States, a tribal court, or court of another country, or an attempt or conspiracy to commit
these offenses.
h. "Sexually dangerous individual" means an individual who meets the definition specified in
section 25-03.3-01.
i. "Temporarily domiciled" means staying or being physically present in this state for more
than thirty days in a calendar year or at a location for longer than ten consecutive days,
attending school for longer than ten days, or maintaining employment in the jurisdiction
for longer than ten days, regardless of the state of the residence.
2. The court shall impose, in addition to any penalty provided by law, a requirement that the
individual register, within three days of coming into a county in which the individual resides, is
homeless, or within the period identified in this section that the individual becomes temporarily
domiciled. The individual must register with the chief of police of the city of the individual's
place of residence, or the sheriff of the county if the individual resides in an area other than a
city. A homeless individual shall register every three days with the sheriff or chief of police of
the jurisdiction in which the individual is physically present. The court shall require an
individual to register by stating this requirement on the court records, if that individual:
a. Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty as a felonious sexual offender
or an attempted felonious sexual offender, including juvenile delinquent adjudications of
equivalent offenses unless the offense is listed in subdivision c.
b. Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty as a sexual offender for, a
misdemeanor or attempted misdemeanor. The court may deviate from requiring an
individual to register if the court first finds the individual is no more than three years older
than the victim if the victim is a minor, the individual has not previously been convicted as
a sexual offender or of a crime against a child, and the individual did not exhibit mental
abnormality or predatory conduct in the commission of the offense.
c. Is a juvenile found delinquent under subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 12.1-20-03,
subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 12.1-20-03, or as a sexual offender for a
misdemeanor. The court may deviate from requiring the juvenile to register if the court
first finds the juvenile has not previously been convicted as a sexual offender or for a
crime against a child, and the juvenile did not exhibit mental abnormality or predatory
conduct in the commission of the offense.
d. Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, a crime against a child or
an attempted crime against a child, including juvenile delinquent adjudications of
equivalent offenses. Except if the offense is described in section 12.1-29-02, or section
12.1-18-01 or 12.1-18-02 and the person is not the parent of the victim, the court may
deviate from requiring an individual to register if the court first finds the individual has not
previously been convicted as a sexual offender or for a crime against a child, and the
individual did not exhibit mental abnormality or predatory conduct in the commission of
the offense.
e.d. Has pled guilty or nolo contendere, or been found guilty, or been adjudicated delinquent
of any crime against another individual which is not otherwise specified in this section if
the court determines that registration is warranted by the nature of the crime and
therefore orders registration for the individual. If the court orders an individual to register
as an offender under this section, the individual shall comply with all of the registration
requirements in this chapter.
e. Is a child who has been adjudicated delinquent of an offense which would classify the
child as a sexual offender, the prosecutor requested the court to consider sexual offender
registration, and the court determines the child:

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 6
(1) Exhibited a mental abnormality or predatory conduct in the commission of the
offense; or
(2) Previously has been adjudicated as a sexual offender.
3. If a court has not ordered an individual to register in this state, an individual who resides, is
homeless, or is temporarily domiciled in this state shall register if the individual:
a. Is incarcerated or is on probation or parole after July 31, 1995, for a crime against a child
described in section 12.1-29-02, or section 12.1-18-01 or 12.1-18-02 if the individual was
not the parent of the victim, or as a sexual offender;
b. Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been adjudicated for or found guilty of, an
offense in a court of this state for which registration is mandatory under this section or an
offense from another court in the United States, a tribal court, or court of another country
equivalent to those offenses set forth in this section; or
c. Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been found guilty of, a crime against a child
or as a sexual offender for which registration is mandatory under this section if the
conviction occurred after July 31, 1985.
4. In its consideration of mental abnormality or predatory conduct, the court shall consider the
age of the offender, the age of the victim, the difference in ages of the victim and offender, the
circumstances and motive of the crime, the relationship of the victim and offender, and the
mental state of the offender. The court may order an offender to be evaluated by a qualified
counselor, psychologist, or physician before sentencing. Except as provided under
subdivision ed of subsection 2, the court shallmay state on the record in open court its
affirmative finding for not requiring an offender to register.
5. When an individual is required to register under this section, the official in charge of a facility
or institution where the individual required to register is confined, or the department, shall,
before the discharge, parole, or release of that individual, inform the individual of the duty to
register pursuant to this section. The official or the department shall require the individual to
read and sign a form as required by the attorney general, stating that the duty of the individual
to register has been explained to that individual. The official in charge of the place of
confinement, or the department, shall obtain the address where the individual expects to
reside, attend school, or work upon discharge, parole, or release and shall report the address
to the attorney general. The official in charge of the place of confinement, or the department,
shall give three copies of the form to the individual and shall send three copies to the attorney
general no later than forty-five days before the scheduled release of that individual. The
attorney general shall forward one copy to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction
where the individual expects to reside, attend school, or work upon discharge, parole, or
release, one copy to the prosecutor who prosecuted the individual, and one copy to the court
in which the individual was prosecuted. All forms must be transmitted and received by the law
enforcement agency, prosecutor, and court thirty days before the discharge, parole, or release
of the individual.
6. An individual who is required to register pursuant to this section who is released on probation
or discharged upon payment of a fine must, before the release or discharge, be informed of
the duty to register under this section by the court in which that individual is convicted. The
court shall require the individual to read and sign a form as required by the attorney general,
stating that the duty of the individual to register under this section has been explained to that
individual. The court shall obtain the address where the individual expects to reside, attend
school, or work upon release or discharge and shall report the address to the attorney general
within three days. The court shall give one copy of the form to the individual and shall send
two copies to the attorney general. The attorney general shall forward one copy to the

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 7
appropriate law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the individual expects to reside,
attend school, or work upon discharge, parole, or release.
7. Registration consists of a written or electronic statement signed by the individual, giving the
information required by the attorney general, and the biometric data and photograph of the
individual. An individual who is not required to provide a sample of blood and other body fluids
under section 31-13-03 or by the individual's state or court of conviction or adjudication shall
submit a sample of blood and other body fluids for inclusion in a centralized database of DNA
identification records under section 31-13-05. The collection, submission, testing and analysis
of, and records produced from, samples of blood and other body fluids, are subject to chapter
31-13. Evidence of the DNA profile comparison is admissible in accordance with section
31-13-02. A report of the DNA analysis certified by the state crime laboratory is admissible in
accordance with section 31-13-05. A district court shall order an individual who refuses to
submit a sample of blood or other body fluids for registration purposes to show cause at a
specified time and place why the individual should not be required to submit the sample
required under this subsection. Within three days after registration, the registering law
enforcement agency shall forward the statement, biometric data, and photograph to the
attorney general and shall submit the sample of the individual's blood and body fluids to the
state crime laboratory. If an individual required to register under this section has a change in
vehicle or computer online identity, the individual shall register, within three days after the
change, with the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the individual's place of
residence of the individual's new vehicle or computer online identity. If an individual required to
register pursuant to this section has a change in name, school, or residence or employment
address, that individual shall register, at least ten days before the change, with the law
enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the individual's place of residence of the
individual's new name, school, residence address, or employment address. A change in
school or employment address includes the termination of school or employment for which an
individual required to register under this section, the individual shall register within three days
of the termination with the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the individual's
place of residence. The law enforcement agency, within three days after receipt of the
information, shall forward it to the attorney general. The attorney general shall forward the
appropriate registration data to the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the
new place of residence, school, or employment. Upon a change of address, the individual
required to register also shall register within three days at the law enforcement agency having
local jurisdiction of the new place of residence. If an individual required to register in North
Dakota, including in a tribal registry, resides in another state or on tribal lands, that individual
shall register employment and school addresses and any changes in required registration
information with the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction over the school or
employment address. The individual registering under this section shall periodically confirm
the information required under this subsection in a manner and at an interval determined by
the attorney general. A law enforcement agency that has previously registered an offender
may omit the biometric data portion of the registration if that agency has a set of biometric
data on file for that individual and is personally familiar with and can visually identify the
offender. These provisions also apply in any other state that requires registration.
8. An individual required to register under this section shall comply with the registration
requirement for the longer of the following periods:
a. A period of fifteen years after the date of sentence or order deferring or suspending
sentence upon a plea or finding of guilt or after release from incarceration, whichever is
later;
b. A period of twenty-five years after the date of sentence or order deferring or suspending
sentence upon a plea or finding of guilt or after release from incarceration, whichever is
later, if the offender is assigned a moderate risk by the attorney general as provided in
subsection 12; or

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 8
c. For the life of the individual, if that individual:
(1) On two or more occasions has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of a crime against a child or as a sexual offender. If all qualifying offenses are
misdemeanors, this lifetime provision does not apply unless a qualifying offense
was committed after August 1, 1999;
(2) Pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, or is found guilty of, an offense committed after
August 1, 1999, which is described in subdivision a of subsection 1 of section
12.1-20-03, section 12.1-20-03.1, or subdivision d of subsection 1 of section
12.1-20-03 if the person is an adult and the victim is under age twelve, or section
12.1-18-01 if that individual is an adult other than a parent of the victim, or an
equivalent offense from another court in the United States, a tribal court, or court of
another country; or
(3) Is assigned a high risk by the attorney general as provided in subsection 12.
9. An individual required to register under this section who violates this section is guilty of a
class C felony. The failure of a homeless individual to register as required in subsections 2
and 3 is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section. The clerk of court shall forward all
warrants issued for a violation of this section to the county sheriff, who shall enter all such
warrants into the national crime information center wanted person file. A court may not relieve
an individual, other than a juvenile, who violates this section from serving a term of at least
ninety days in jail and completing probation of one year.
10. When an individual is released on parole or probation and is required to register pursuant to
this section, but fails to do so within the time prescribed, the court shall order the probation, or
the parole board shall order the parole, of the individual revoked.
11. If an individual required to register pursuant to this section is temporarily sent outside the
facility or institution where that individual is confined under conviction or sentence, the local
law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the place where that individual is being sent
must be notified within a reasonable time period before that individual is released from the
facility or institution. This subsection does not apply to any individual temporarily released
under guard from the facility or institution in which that individual is confined.
12. The attorney general, with the assistance of the department and the juvenile courts, shall
develop guidelines for the risk assessment of sexual offenders who are required to register,
with a low-risk, moderate-risk, or high-risk level being assigned to each offender as follows:
a. The department shall conduct a risk assessment of sexual offenders who are
incarcerated in institutions under the control of the department and sexual offenders who
are on supervised probation. The department, in a timely manner, shall provide the
attorney general any information, including the offender's level of risk and supporting
documentation, concerning individuals required to be registered under this section who
are about to be released or placed into the community.
b. The attorney general shall conduct a risk assessment of sexual offenders who are not
under the custody or supervision of the department. The attorney general may adopt a
law enforcement agency's previous assignment of risk level for an individual if the
assessment was conducted in a manner substantially similar to the guidelines developed
under this subsection.
c. The juvenile courts or the agency having legal custody of a juvenile shall conduct a risk
assessment of juvenile sexual offenders who are required to register under this section.
The juvenile courts or the agency having legal custody of a juvenile shall provide the
attorney general any information, including the offender's level of risk and supporting

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 9
documentation, concerning juveniles required to register and who are about to be
released or placed into the community.
d. The attorney general shall notify the offender of the risk level assigned to that offender.
An offender may request a review of that determination with the attorney general's sexual
offender risk assessment committee and may present any information that the offender
believes may lower the assigned risk level.
13. An individual assessed as a high-risk sexual offender in accordance with subsection 12, may
not reside within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] of a public or nonpublic preschool or
elementary, middle, or high school.
14. Relevant and necessary conviction and registration information must be disclosed to the
public by a law enforcement agency if the individual is a moderate or high risk and the agency
determines that disclosure of the conviction and registration information is necessary for public
protection. The attorney general shall develop guidelines for public disclosure of offender
registration information. Public disclosure may include internet access if the offender:
a. Is required to register for a lifetime under subsection 8;
b. Has been determined to be a high risk to the public by the department, the attorney
general, or the courts, according to guidelines developed by those agencies; or
c. Has been determined to be a high risk to the public by an agency of another state or the
federal government.
If the offender has been determined to be a moderate risk, public disclosure must include, at a
minimum, notification of the offense to the victim registered under chapter 12.1-34 and to any
agency, civic organization, or group of persons who have characteristics similar to those of a
victim of the offender. Upon request, law enforcement agencies may release conviction and
registration information regarding low-risk, moderate-risk, or high-risk offenders.
15. A state officer, law enforcement agency, or public school district or governing body of a
nonpublic school or any appointee, officer, or employee of those entities is not subject to civil
or criminal liability for making risk determinations, allowing a sexual offender to attend a
school function under section 12.1-20-25, or for disclosing or for failing to disclose information
as permitted by this section.
16. If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent and required or ordered to register as a sexual offender
or as an offender against a child under this section, the juvenile shall comply with the
registration requirements in this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a law
enforcement agency shall register a juvenile offender in the same manner as adult offenders
and may release any relevant and necessary information on file to other law enforcement
agencies, the department of health and human services, or the public if disclosure is
necessary to protect public health or safety. The law enforcement agency shall release any
relevant and necessary information on file to the superintendent or principal of the school the
juvenile attends. The school administration shall notify others in similar positions if the juvenile
transfers to another learning institution in or outside the state.
17. If an individual has been required to register as a sexual offender or an offender against a
child under section 12.1-32-15 or former section 27-20-52.1 before August 1, 1999, the
individual may petition the court to be removed from the offender list if registration is no longer
mandatory for that individual. In considering the petition, the court shall comply with the
requirements of this section.
18. A sexual offender who is currently assigned a moderate or high-risk level by the attorney
general may not use a state park of this state as a residence or residential address to comply
with the registration requirements of this section. Before arriving at a state park for overnight

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 10
lodging or camping, a sexual offender who is assigned a moderate or high-risk level by the
attorney general shall notify a parks and recreation department law enforcement officer at the
state park where the sexual offender will be staying.
19. When an individual who is required to register pursuant to this section plans to travel outside
of the United States, at least twenty-one days before the intended travel, the individual shall
inform the agency with which the individual last registered the individual's residence address
the details of the intended travel. Upon receipt of the information from the registering law
enforcement agency, the attorney general shall report the travel to the United States marshal
service.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-09-33.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-09-33.4. Student misconduct - Prohibition against participation in extracurricular
activities.
1. The board of a school district shallmay prohibit a student from participating in any
extracurricular activity if:
a. The student has pled guilty to or been convicted of a criminal offense and sentenced
under section 12.1-32-02.1 or pled guilty or been convicted of an offense specified in
subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-09.1;
b. The student has:
(1) An order prohibiting contact issued against the student at the request of another
student or employee of the school under section 12.1-31.2-02;
(2) A disorderly conduct restraining order issued against the student at the request of
another student or employee of the school under section 12.1-31.2-01, except a
temporary restraining order under subsection 4 of section 12.1-31.2-01; or
(3) A protection order issued against the student at the request of another student or
employee of the school, except a temporary protection order under section
14-07.1-03; or
(4) Any other order issued against the student prohibiting contact with a student or
employee of the school which is signed by a district judge or a judicial referee within
a delinquency or criminal case;
c. The principal of the school receives information pertaining to an offense or order included
under this section as provided in section 27-20.2-21; or
d. The victim of the offense or the subject of the order notifies the principal of the offense or
order.
2. For purposes of this section, a representative of the juvenile court system may notify the
principal of a school regarding the existence of files or records of the juvenile court pertaining
to a student of the school which are open to inspection by the principal under section
27-20.2-21.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 27-20.2-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. "Child in need of services" means a child who in any of the foregoing instances is in need of
treatment or rehabilitation:

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 11
a. Is habitually and without justification truant from school subject to compulsory school
attendance and is absent from school without an authorized excuse more than three
days during a school year;
b. Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child's parent,
guardian, or other custodian, including running away, and is ungovernable or who is
willfully in a situation dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the child or
others;
c. Has committed an offense applicable only to a child, except for an offense committed by
a minor fourteen years of age or older under subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 or an
equivalent local ordinance or resolution; or
d. Is under the age of fourteen years and has purchased, possessed, smoked, or used
tobacco, a tobacco-related product, an electronic smoking device, or an alternative
nicotine product in violation of subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03. As used in this
subdivision, "electronic smoking device" and "alternative nicotine product" have the same
meaning as in section 12.1-31-03; and
e. In any of the foregoing instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 27-20.2-09 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. The giving of information and advice and any conditions imposed for the conduct and control
of the child may not extend beyond six months from the day commenced unless extended by
the court for an additional period not to exceed six months and does not authorize the
detention of the child if not otherwise permitted by this chapter. For a driving-related offense,
the conditions may include a restriction on the child's driving privileges as authorized under
section 27-20.4-1917 of this Act.
SECTION 12. A new section to chapter 27-20.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Petition.
1. A petition alleging delinquency under this chapter must be reviewed by the director, the court,
or other person designated by the director and authorized by the court to determine whether
the filing of the petition is in the best interest of the public and the child.
2. The state's attorney shall prepare, file, and serve a petition alleging delinquent conduct on the
parties. The juvenile court shall conduct an inquiry into and provide the last known address of
the parents or legal guardian of the child in the referral to the state's attorney.
3. A petition alleging delinquent conduct may not include the adult class level of the offense
unless the offense level is a necessary element of the delinquent conduct.
SECTION 13. A new section to chapter 27-20.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Fitness to proceed - Lack of criminal responsibility .
In a juvenile court proceeding involving the issue of fitness to proceed or criminal responsibility, the
court shall determine whether the child:
1. Is fit to proceed in accordance with title 27; and
2. Lacked criminal responsibility for the commission of an offense in accordance with chapter
12.1 - 04.1 .

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 12
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 27-20.4-11 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. An informal agreement may not extend beyond six months from the day the agreement was
agreed upon. An extension may be granted by the court for an additional period not to exceed
six months. An extension may not authorize the detention of the child if not otherwise
permitted by this chapter. For a driving-related offense, the agreement may include a
restriction on the child's driving privileges as allowed under section 27-20.4-1917 of this Act.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 27-20.4-18 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. A probation order entered by the court must place the child under the supervision of the
director, unless the child is over eighteen years of age and the child's risk and needs require
supervision by the department of corrections and rehabilitation under subsection 13 of section
27-20.4-15 27 - 20.4 - 17 .
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 27-20.4-20 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. In addition to a child being ordered to make restitution under section 27-20.4-16 27 - 20.4 - 17 , a
parent of a child adjudged delinquent may be ordered to make restitution on the child's behalf
in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars.
SECTION 17. A new section to chapter 27-20.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Collateral consequences - Registration - Firearms - Driving privileges .
1. A child may be ordered to register as a sexual offender under section 12.1 - 32 - 15 .
2. A child may be prohibited from possessing a firearm in accordance with section 62.1 - 02 - 01 .
3. If a child is adjudicated delinquent of an offense that would be a class A misdemeanor or a
felony if the offense were committed by an adult, the juvenile court may suspend the child's
driving privileges for a period of up to six months for the first offense, and up to one year for a
second or subsequent offense. The juvenile court may order the successful completion of an
appropriate driver's examination as a condition for reinstating the child's driving privileges.
a. If the juvenile court suspends a child's driving privileges, the court immediately shall take
possession of the child's driver's license or permit and send a copy of the court's order to
the director of the department of transportation who shall make notation of the child's
suspended driving privileges.
b. The record of the child's suspension of driving privileges under this section:
(1) Must be kept confidential;
(2) May not be released except to law enforcement personnel in connection with law
enforcement activities; and
(3) May not be disclosed to or shared with the licensing officials of any other state or
jurisdiction.
c. At the end of the six-month or one-year suspension period, the director shall remove and
destroy all records of the child's suspension of driving privileges under this section.
4. A child may be prohibited from participating in extracurricular activities in accordance with
section 15.1 - 09 - 33.4 .

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 13
SECTION 18. AMENDMENT. Section 62.1-02-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
62.1-02-01. Persons who are not to possess firearms - Penalty.
1. a. A person who has been convicted anywhere of a felony offense involving violence or
intimidation in violation of chapters 12.1-16 through 12.1-25 or an equivalent felony
offense of another state or the federal government is prohibited from owning a firearm or
having one in possession from the date of conviction and continuing for ten years after
the date of conviction or the date of release from incarceration, parole, or probation,
whichever is latest.
b. A person who has been convicted anywhere of a felony offense of this or another state or
the federal government not provided for in subdivision a or who has been convicted of a
class A misdemeanor offense involving violence or intimidation in violation of chapters
12.1-16 through 12.1-25 or an equivalent offense of another state or the federal
government and the offense was committed while using or possessing a firearm, a
dangerous weapon, or, as defined in section 12.1-01-04, a destructive device or an
explosive, is prohibited from owning a firearm or having one in possession from the date
of conviction and continuing for five years after the date of conviction or the date of
release from incarceration, parole, or probation, whichever is latest.
c. A person who is or has ever been diagnosed and confined or committed to a hospital or
other institution in this state or elsewhere by a court of competent jurisdiction, other than
a person who has had the petition that provided the basis for the diagnosis, confinement,
or commitment dismissed under section 25-03.1-17, 25-03.1-18, or 25-03.1-19, or
equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction, as a person requiring treatment as defined in
section 25-03.1-02, or as a mentally deficient individual, is prohibited from purchasing a
firearm or having one in possession. This limitation does not apply to a person who has
not suffered from the disability for the previous three years or who has successfully
petitioned for relief under section 62.1-02-01.2.
d. A person under the age of eighteen years may not possess a handgun except that such
a person, while under the direct supervision of an adult, may possess a handgun for the
purposes of firearm safety training, target shooting, or hunting.
e. A child who has been adjudicated delinquent of a felony offense involving violence or
intimidation in violation of chapters 12.1 - 16 through 12.1 - 25 or an equivalent felony
offense of another state or the federal government is prohibited from owning a firearm or
having one in possession from the date of adjudication and continuing for ten years after
the date of adjudication.
f. A child who has been adjudicated of a class A misdemeanor offense involving violence or
intimidation in violation of chapters 12.1 - 16 through 12.1 - 25 or an equivalent offense o f
another state or the federal government, and the offense was committed while using or
possessing a firearm, a dangerous weapon, a destructive device, or an explosive is
prohibited from owning a firearm or having one in possession from the date of
adjudication and continuing for five years after the date of adjudication.
A person who violates subdivision a or b is guilty of a class C felony, and a person who
violates subdivision c or d is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
2. For the purposes of this section, "conviction" means a determination that the person
committed one of the above-mentioned crimes upon a verdict of guilt, a plea of guilty, or a plea
of nolo contendere even though:
a. The court suspended execution of sentence in accordance with subsection 3 of section
12.1-32-02;

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 14
b. The court deferred imposition of sentence in accordance with subsection 4 of section
12.1-32-02;
c. The court placed the person on probation;
d. The person's conviction has been reduced in accordance with subsection 9 of section
12.1-32-02 or section 12.1-32-07.1;
e. Sentence dispositions, sentence reductions, or offense determinations equivalent to this
section were imposed or granted by a court, board, agency, or law of another state or the
federal government; or
f. The person committed an offense equivalent to an offense described in subdivision a or
be or f of subsection 1 when that person was subject to juvenile adjudication or
proceedings and a determination of a court under chapter 27-20.4 or of a court of
another state or the federal government was made that the person committed the
delinquent act or offense.
3. A felon who is not sentenced under section 12.1-32-09.1 may possess a rifle that has a barrel
sixteen inches [40.72 centimeters] or longer or a shotgun that has a barrel eighteen inches
[45.72 centimeters] or longer and which is one of the following:
a. A firearm, including any firearm with a matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type
of ignition system, manufactured before 1899.
b. A replica of any firearm described in subdivision a, if the replica is not designed or
redesigned for using rimfire or conventional centerfire fixed ammunition or uses rimfire or
conventional centerfire fixed ammunition that is no longer manufactured in the United
States and which is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.
c. A muzzleloading rifle or muzzleloading shotgun designed to use black powder or a black
powder substitute and which cannot use fixed ammunition.
SECTION 19. REPEAL. Sections 27-20.4-12, 27-20.4-13, and 27-20.4-19 of the North Dakota
Century Code are repealed.
SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
CONTRACT SERVICES - GENERAL FUND - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $300,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of health and human services for the purpose
of contracting for juvenile lack of criminal responsibility evaluation services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The funding in this section is considered a one-time funding
item.

S. B. NO. 2037 - PAGE 15
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2037.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 66 Nays 26 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State